District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.19b

Sources of Registry information; confidentiality.

(a)

The organ procurement organization:

(1)

May acquire and use donor information from all available sources; and

(2)

Shall acquire and use donor information from the Department of Motor Vehicles submitted in accordance with § 7-1531.19c and with any regulations promulgated pursuant to § 7-1531.19f.

(b)

Personally identifiable information on the Registry about a donor or prospective donor may not be used or disclosed without the express consent of the donor, prospective donor, or person that made the anatomical gift for any purpose other than to determine whether the donor or prospective donor has made, amended, or revoked an anatomical gift.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 20b, 55 DCR 2532

History